cs: Kompatibilní typ paliva: Butan; Elektrické; Etanol; Petrolej; Zemní plyn; Propan; Jiné
pl: Zgodny typ paliwa: Butan; Elektryczne; Etanol; Nafta; Gaz ziemny; Propan; Pozostałe
ja: 対応燃料タイプ: ブタン; 電気; エタノール; 灯油; 天然ガス; プロパン; その他
de: Kompatibler Brennstofftyp: Butan; Elektrisch; Ethanol; Petroleum; Erdgas; Propan; Sonstiges
th: ประเภทเชื้อเพลิงที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: บิวเทน; ไฟฟ้า; เอทานอล; น้ำมันก๊าด; แก๊สธรรมชาติ; โพรเพน; อื่นๆ
tr: Uyumlu yakıt türü: Bütan; Elektrikli; Etanol; Gaz yağı; Doğal gaz; Propan; Diğer
nl: Compatibel type brandstof: Butaan; Elektrisch; Ethanol; Kerosine; Aardgas; Propaan; Overig
pt-BR: Tipo de combustível compatível: Butano; Elétrica; Etanol; Querosene; Gás natural; Propano; Outro
it: Tipo di combustibile compatibile: Butano; Elettrico; Etanolo; Cherosene; Gas naturale; Propano; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de combustível compatível: Butano; Elétrico; Etanol; Querosene; Gás natural; Propano; Outro
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ paliva: Bután; Elektrický; Etanol; Petrolej; Zemný plyn; Propán; Iné
zh-TW: 相容燃料類型: 丁烷; 電動式; 乙醇; 煤油; 天然氣; 丙烷; 其他
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta goriva: Butan; Električna; Etanol; Kerozin; Zemeljski plin; Propan; Druga
sv: Kompatibel bränsletyp: Butan; Elektrisk; Etanol; Fotogen; Naturgas; Propan; Övrigt
fi: Yhteensopiva polttoainetyyppi: Butaani; Sähkö; Etanoli; Kerosiini; Luonnonkaasu; Propaani; Muu
lt-LT: Suderinamas kuro tipas: Butanas; Elektrinis; Etanolis; Žibalas; Gamtinės dujos; Propanas; Kita
nb: Kompatibel drivstofftype: Butan; Elektrisk; Etanol; Parafin; Naturgass; Propan; Annet
es: Tipo de combustible compatible: Butano; Eléctrico; Etanol; Queroseno; Gas natural; Propano; Otros
el: Συμβατός τύπος καυσίμου: Βουτάνιο; Ηλεκτρικό; Αιθανόλη; Κηροζίνη; Φυσικό αέριο; Προπάνιο; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tip de combustibil compatibil: Butan; Electric; Etanol; Kerosen; Gaz natural; Propan; Altele
ru: Совместимый тип топлива: Бутан; Электричество; Этанол; Керосин; Природный газ; Пропан; Другое
en: Compatible fuel type: Butane; Electric; Ethanol; Kerosene; Natural gas; Propane; Other
fr: Type de combustible compatible: Butane; Électrique; Éthanol; Kérosène; Gaz naturel; Propane; Autre
bg-BG: Съвместим тип гориво: Бутан; Електрически; Етанол; Керосин; Природен газ; Пропан; Друго
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta goriva: Butan; Električna; Etanol; Kerozin; Prirodni plin; Propan; Ostalo
vi: Loại nhiên liệu tương thích: Butane; Điện; Ethanol; Dầu hỏa; Khí tự nhiên; Propan; Khác
da: Kompatibel brændstoftype: Butan; Elektrisk; Ethanol; Petroleum; Naturgas; Propan; Andet
ko: 호환 연료 유형: 뷰테인; 전자식; 에탄올; 케러신; 천연가스; 프로페인; 기타
zh-CN: 适用燃料类型: 丁烷; 电动; 乙醇; 煤油; 天然气; 丙烷; 其他
hu: Kompatibilis üzemanyag-típus: Bután; Elektromos; Etanol; Kerozin; Földgáz; Propán; Egyéb